Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.020

Scope.

(1) This chapter applies to the provision of telehealth services to a patient located in this state.

(2) This chapter does not apply to the provision of telehealth services to a patient located outside this state.

[ 2024 c 212 s 3.]